Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.079] SALE OF FLAVORED NITROUS OXIDE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Flavored nitrous oxide" means a canister containing nitrous oxide that (1) imparts a taste or smell, and (2) is sold by a retailer. new text end new text begin (c) "Retailer" means a person, whether located within Minnesota or otherwise, engaged in the business of selling or offering for sale flavored nitrous oxide to a consumer in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Prohibition. new text end new text begin A retailer is prohibited from selling or offering for sale flavored nitrous oxide to a consumer in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Violation. new text end new text begin A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end